en: Tongue Depressors
xx: Tongue Depressors
cs: Stlačovače jazyka
da: Tungedepressorer
de: Mundspatel
es: Bajalenguas
fr: Abaisse-langues
it: Abbassalingua
ja: 舌圧子
nl: Tongspatels
no: Munnspatler
pl: Szpatułki
pt: Palito abaixador de língua
ru: Медицинские шпатели
sv: Tungspatlar
tr: Dil Baskı Çubukları

en: Medical Teaching Equipment
xx: Medical Teaching Equipment
cs: Výukové pomůcky pro zdravotnické a lékařské obory
da: Medicinsk undervisningsudstyr
de: Medizinische Schulungsgeräte
es: Equipos para la docencia médica
fr: Matériel d'enseignement médical
it: Apparecchiature formative per medici
ja: 医療教育用品
nl: Apparatuur voor medisch onderwijs
no: Medisinsk opplæringsutstyr
pl: Sprzęt do szkoleń medycznych
pt: Equipamento de ensino médico
ru: Медицинское оборудование для обучения
sv: Medicinsk utbildningsutrustning
tr: Tıp Eğitimi Ekipmanları

en: Medical & Emergency Response Training Mannequins
xx: Medical & Emergency Response Training Mannequins
cs: Zdravotnické a resuscitační figuríny
da: Førstehjælpsdukker
de: HLW-Puppen
es: Maniquís para formación ante situaciones médicas y de emergencia
fr: Mannequins de formation médicale et de secourisme
it: Manichini di addestramento per rianimazione o salvataggio
ja: CPRマネキン
nl: Reanimatie- en oefenpoppen
no: Dukker for medisinsk opplæring
pl: Manekiny do szkoleń z pierwszej pomocy
pt: Manequins para prática de ressuscitação cardiopulmonar
ru: Медицинские манекены для обучения
sv: HLR-dockor
tr: Tıbbi ve Acil Müdahale Eğitim Mankenleri

en: Scrub Caps
xx: Scrub Caps
cs: Operační čepice
da: Operationshuer
de: OP-Hauben
es: Gorros quirúrgicos
fr: Charlottes médicales
it: Copricapo chirurgici
ja: 手術帽
nl: Operatiekappen
no: Sykehusluer
pl: Czepki lekarskie
pt: Toucas cirúrgicas
ru: Медицинские шапочки
sv: Operationsmössor
tr: Bandanalar

en: Scrubs
xx: Scrubs
cs: Lékařské pláště
da: Operationstøj
de: OP-Bekleidung
es: Uniformes hospitalarios
fr: Vêtements médicaux
it: Prodotti per lavaggio mani
ja: 診察衣
nl: Operatiekleding
no: Sykehusklær
pl: Odzież chirurgiczna
pt: Roupas cirúrgicas
ru: Медицинские костюмы
sv: Operationskläder
tr: Boneler

en: Surgical Gowns
xx: Surgical Gowns
cs: Chirurgické pláště
da: Operationskitler
de: OP-Kittel
es: Batas quirúrgicas
fr: Blouses chirurgicales
it: Camici chirurgici
ja: 手術衣
nl: Operatiejasjes
no: Operasjonsfrakker
pl: Fartuchy chirurgiczne
pt: Aventais cirúrgicos
ru: Хирургические халаты
sv: Operationsrockar
tr: Cerrahi Önlükler

en: Mining & Quarrying
xx: Mining & Quarrying
cs: Těžba
da: Minedrift og stenbrud
de: Bergbau & Steinbruch
es: Minería y explotación de canteras
fr: Exploitation des carrières et extraction
it: Estrazione e cave
ja: 鉱業・採石
nl: Mijnbouw en steengroeven
no: Gruvedrift og steinbrudd
pl: Górnictwo głębinowe i odkrywkowe
pt: Mineração
ru: Горное дело
sv: Gruvdrift och stenbrott
tr: Madencilik ve Taş Ocakçılığı

en: Piercing & Tattooing
xx: Piercing & Tattooing
cs: Piercing a tetování
da: Piercing og tatovering
de: Piercing & Tätowieren
es: Piercings y tatuajes
fr: Tatouages et piercings
it: Piercing e tatuaggi
ja: ピアス・タトゥー
nl: Piercing en tatoeages
no: Piercing og tatovering
pl: Piercing i tatuaże
pt: Piercing e tatuagem
ru: Пирсинг и татуировка
sv: Piercing och tatuering
tr: Piercing ve Dövme

en: Piercing Supplies
xx: Piercing Supplies
cs: Piercingové potřeby
da: Piercingudstyr
de: Piercingbedarf
es: Instrumentos para piercings
fr: Matériel de piercing
it: Prodotti per piercing
ja: ピアス用品
nl: Benodigdheden voor piercings
no: Piercingutstyr
pl: Sprzęt do piercingu
pt: Suprimentos para piercings
ru: Материалы для пирсинга
sv: Piercingutrustning
tr: Piercing Sarf Malzemeleri

en: Piercing Needles
xx: Piercing Needles
cs: Piercingové jehly
da: Piercingnåle
de: Piercingnadeln
es: Agujas para piercings
fr: Aiguilles de piercing
it: Aghi per piercing
ja: ピアッサー
nl: Naalden voor piercings
no: Piercingnåler
pl: Igły do piercingu
pt: Agulhas para piercings
ru: Иглы для пирсинга
sv: Piercingnålar
tr: Piercing İğneleri

en: Tattooing Supplies
xx: Tattooing Supplies
cs: Tetovací potřeby
da: Tatoveringsudstyr
de: Tätowierbedarf
es: Instrumentos para tatuajes
fr: Matériel de tatouage
it: Prodotti per tatuaggi
ja: タトゥー用品
nl: Tatoeagebenodigdheden
no: Tatoveringsutstyr
pl: Sprzęt do tatuażu
pt: Suprimentos para tatuagens
ru: Оборудование для татуировки
sv: Tatueringsutrustning
tr: Dövme Sarf Malzemeleri

en: Tattoo Cover-Ups
xx: Tattoo Cover-Ups
cs: Přípravky na zakrytí tetování
da: Tatoveringsdækken
de: Tattoo-Abdeckungen
es: Camuflajes de tatuajes
fr: Accessoires pour couvrir les tatouages
it: Coperture tatuaggi
ja: タトゥー直し
nl: Afdekking voor tatoeages
no: Tatoveringsdekke
pl: Zakrycia tatuaży
pt: Cobertura para tatuagens
ru: Коррекция и исправление татуировок
sv: Tatueringsdöljning
tr: Dövme Kapatıcılar

en: Tattooing Inks
xx: Tattooing Inks
cs: Tetovací inkousty
da: Tatoveringsblæk
de: Tätowierfarben
es: Tintas para tatuajes
fr: Encres de tatouage
it: Inchiostri per tatuaggi
ja: タトゥーインク
nl: Tatoeage-inkt
no: Tatoveringsblekk
pl: Atramenty do tatuażu
pt: Tintas para tatuagem
ru: Краски для татуировки
sv: Tatueringsbläck
tr: Dövme Mürekkepleri

en: Tattooing Machines
xx: Tattooing Machines
cs: Tetovací strojky
da: Tatoveringsmaskiner
de: Tätowiermaschinen
es: Máquinas para tatuajes
fr: Machines à tatouer
it: Macchinette per tatuaggi
ja: タトゥーマシン
nl: Tatoeagemachines
no: Tatoveringsmaskiner
pl: Maszynki do tatuażu
pt: Aparelhos para tatuagem
ru: Машинки для татуировки
sv: Tatueringsmaskiner
tr: Dövme Makineleri

en: Tattooing Needles
xx: Tattooing Needles
cs: Tetovací jehly
da: Tatoveringsnåle
de: Tätowiernadeln
es: Agujas para tatuajes
fr: Aiguilles de tatouage
it: Aghi per tatuaggi
ja: タトゥーニードル
nl: Tatoeagenaalden
no: Tatoveringsnåler
pl: Igły do tatuażu
pt: Agulhas para tatuagem
ru: Иглы для татуировки
sv: Tatueringsnålar
tr: Dövme İğneleri

en: Retail
xx: Retail
cs: Prodejny
da: Detail
de: Einzelhandel
es: Venta al por menor
fr: Commerce de détail
it: Negozi
ja: 小売業
nl: Detailhandel
no: Detaljhandel
pl: Handel detaliczny
pt: Varejo
ru: Розничная торговля
sv: Detaljhandel
tr: Perakende

en: Clothing Display Racks
xx: Clothing Display Racks
cs: Věšáky na oblečení
da: Tøjstativer til display
de: Präsentationsständer für Bekleidung
es: Percheros
fr: Portants à vêtements, Portant
it: Rastrelliere appendiabiti
ja: アパレル什器
nl: Kledingrekken
no: Klesstativer
pl: Wieszaki sklepowe do ubrań
pt: Araras de exibição de roupas
ru: Стеллажи и вешалки для одежды
sv: Konfektionsställ
tr: Kıyafet Teşhir Rafları

en: Display Mannequins
xx: Display Mannequins
cs: Figuríny
da: Mannequiner
de: Schaufensterpuppen
es: Maniquís
fr: Mannequins de présentation
it: Manichini da vetrina
ja: マネキン
nl: Etalagepoppen
no: Utstillingsdukker
pl: Manekiny
pt: Manequins
ru: Манекены для одежды
sv: Mannekänger
tr: Mankenler

en: Mannequin Parts
xx: Mannequin Parts
cs: Díly k figurínám
da: Mannequindele
de: Schaufensterpuppenteile
es: Piezas de maniquíes
fr: Pièces de mannequin
it: Parti di manichini
ja: マネキンパーツ
nl: Etalagepoponderdelen
no: Deler til utstillingsdukker
pl: Części manekinów
pt: Partes de manequins
ru: Детали манекенов
sv: Mannekängdelar
tr: Manken Parçaları

en: Money Handling
xx: Money Handling
cs: Peněžnictví
da: Pengehåndteringssystemer
de: Geldhandhabung
es: Administración de dinero
fr: Manipulation de l'argent
it: Gestione del denaro
ja: レジスター・貨幣処理
nl: Geldverwerking
no: Pengehåndtering
pl: Obrót środkami pieniężnymi
pt: Manuseio de dinheiro
ru: Счётно-денежное оборудование
sv: Pengahantering
tr: Para İşlemleri